Montana, session 2025, HB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of [sections 1 through 6], unless otherwise provided, the
following definitions apply:
(1) "Senior citizen" means a person over 60 years of age.
(2) (a) "Senior citizen center" means a facility operated by a nonprofit corporation or a
governmental organization that provides services to senior citizens in the form of daytime or evening meals,
educational programs, or recreational activities. Services qualifying under this definition must be recognized in
the state plan on aging adopted by the department of public health and human services.
(b) The term does not include a facility that provides living accommodations to senior citizens.
Section 2. Senior citizen center infrastructure account -- use. (1) There is a senior citizen center
infrastructure account within the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102 to provide grant funding to
nonprofit corporations that provide services to senior citizens and for administrative costs related to
administering the grants. The department of commerce shall administer the account.
(2) Up to 3% of the funds appropriated in [section 8] may be allocated for the department's
administrative costs.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 182
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 182
Section 3. Senior citizen center infrastructure grants authorization. (1) The department of
commerce is authorized to make up to $5 million in grants to nonprofit corporations for property acquisition,
construction, space acquisition, remodeling, repairs, and the purchase of appliances and equipment. The
grants authorized in this section are subject to the conditions set forth in [section 5].
(2) The department of commerce must receive proposals from nonprofit corporations for senior
citizen center infrastructure projects.
(3) Funding for projects may be provided only as long as there are sufficient funds available from
the amount that was deposited or transferred in the senior citizen center infrastructure account for grants
established in [section 2]. Funding for these projects must be made available in the order that the grant
recipients satisfy the conditions described in [section 5].
Section 4. Eligibility -- submission deadline -- priority -- guidelines. (1) A nonprofit corporation
may apply to the department of commerce for senior citizen center infrastructure grants under [section 3].
(2) Nonprofit corporations shall submit grant applications to the department of commerce in order
to be eligible for funding under [section 3].
(3) The department of commerce is authorized to adopt guidelines necessary to implement
[sections 3 through 5].
Section 5. Condition of grants -- disbursement of funds. (1) The disbursement of grant funds for
the projects chosen by the department of commerce pursuant to [section 3] is subject to the following
conditions:
(a) for grants in an amount of $25,000 or more, the grant recipient shall document the availability
of matching funds or in-kind contribution of assets with an appraised value from private sources representing at
least $1 in value for each $1 of the grant;
(b) the grant recipient shall execute a grant agreement with the department of commerce that
includes a project management plan and reporting requirements to track the outcomes of allocated grants; and
(c) the grant recipient shall satisfy other specific requirements considered necessary by the
department of commerce to accomplish the purpose of the project as evidenced by the application to the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 182
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 182
department of commerce.
(2) Projects must adhere to the design standards required by applicable regulations. Recipients of
program funds for projects that are not subject to any design standards must comply with generally accepted
industry standards.
(3) If actual project expenses are lower than the projected expense of the project, the department
of commerce shall reduce the amount of grant funds to be provided to grant recipients.
Section 6. Maximum state funding available -- for each project -- for each county. (1) The
amount of state funding allocated to entities within any individual county under [sections 3 through 5] may not
exceed $350,000. No more than two applications may be funded in any one county.
(2) The amount of a grant to any single project may not exceed $250,000.
Section 7. Exclusion. The provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, do not apply to the
provisions of [this act].
Section 8. Legislative intent. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that [this act] be quickly
implemented by the department of commerce and that the department develop and implement a grant
application process that is efficient and user-friendly. The application must include:
(a) the name, address, telephone number, and e-mail address of the applicant, the name of the
contact person, and the contact person's contact information, if different from the applicant;
(b) a statement of the problem or problems the applicant is experiencing that the grant is expected
to address. Examples include repairing a leaky roof, replacing an obsolete stove, or insufficient insulation in the
building.
(c) a list of activities the applicant plans to undertake using the grant funds to address the
identified problem or problems. Examples include replacing the roof, purchasing a new stove, or adding 18
inches of fiber fill insulation to the attic.
(d) a cost estimate for each of the proposed activities to be undertaken by the applicant. The
estimate must be supported by documents from contractors, equipment vendors, and other parties who plan to
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 182
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 182
provide services to the applicant.
(e) a schedule of when the proposed project is to commence and be completed; and
(f) clear evidence that the applicant has the required cash match for the grant. This can include
copies of bank statements or letters from the applicant's bank or financial manager testifying to the availability
of matching funds. Statements that promise matching funds in the future or claims that the applicant is seeking
additional grant funding are not acceptable.
(2) Governmental applicants are required to follow the public notice and public participation
requirements contained in Article II, sections 8 and 9, of the Montana constitution and Title 7 of the Montana
Code Annotated. Nongovernmental applicants are not required to meet this requirement.
(3) Applicants must be recognized units of government in Montana or legally incorporated in the
state of Montana and be in good standing with the secretary of state. Individuals and partnerships are ineligible
for funding.
(4) Within 10 days of receipt of a grant application, the department shall conduct a completeness
review to ensure that all parts of the application are present. If incomplete, the department shall notify the
applicant in writing of any deficiencies and provide the applicant with 15 days to correct the deficiencies.
(5) Applications may be submitted to the department electronically or in written form.
(6) The applicant must have a financial system that segregates the grant and matching funds in a
separate account to ensure that the funds are not commingled with other money managed by the applicant.
The accounting system must be capable of accurately tracking project revenues and expenditures.
(7) The applicant shall submit a quarterly progress report with the department providing a narrative
statement of the activities undertaken and completed as well as a statement showing expenditures made during
the previous 3 months supported by copies of the invoices paid.
(8) The applicant shall enter into a contract with the department in order to receive funds under a
grant award. Funds will be disbursed on a reimbursement basis by the department.
Section 9. Transfer of funds. By July 1, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer $5 million from the
general fund to the senior citizen center infrastructure account established in [section 2].
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 182
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 182
Section 10. Appropriation. There is appropriated $5 million from the senior citizen center
infrastructure account established in [section 2] to the department of commerce for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, for grants authorized in [sections 3 through 5]. Appropriations are authorized to continue through the
biennium beginning July 1, 2029.
Section 11. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
Section 12. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2031.
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 182
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 182, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 182
INTRODUCED BY J. FITZPATRICK, P. TUSS, E. BOLDMAN, W. MCKAMEY, J. KASSMIER, G. LAMMERS,
V. MOORE, L. BENNETT, D. HARVEY, C. KEOGH, K. WALSH, B. BARKER
AN ACT CREATING A SENIOR CITIZEN CENTER GRANT PROGRAM TO FUND CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION,
MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR PROJECTS, AND EQUIPMENT PURCHASES; PROVIDING AN
APPROPRIATION; ALLOWING APPROPRIATIONS TO CONTINUE INTO THE 2027 AND 2029 BIENNIUMS;
PROVIDING AN EXCLUSION FROM CERTAIN PARTS IN TITLE 75; PROVIDING LEGISLATIVE INTENT; AND
PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION DATE.”